Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . 0w. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 299.1, subsection 5, relating to absences from school because of involvement in a school-sponsored activity, program, competition, or project in the same manner as a school district. Sec. 2. Section 299.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 5. The board of directors of each public school district and the governing body of each accredited nonpublic school shall adopt a policy that requires the school district or the accredited nonpublic school to grant a student an exempt absence when the student is absent from school because of the studentâs involvement in a school-sponsored activity, program, competition, or project. The policy shall also require the school district or accredited nonpublic school to allow a student who is absent from school because of the studentâs involvement in a school-sponsored activity, program, Senate File 2219, p. 2 competition, or project to make up any classwork the student was not able to complete as a result of the absence. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2219, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor